Massachusetts, session 194th, H313.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40R of the General Laws, as most recently amended by Chapter 268 of the Acts
of 2022, is hereby amended in section 9 by striking out subsections (a) and (b) and inserting in
place thereof the following:-
(a) The commonwealth shall pay from the trust fund or other funds from appropriations
or other money authorized by the general court a zoning incentive payment, according to the
following schedule:
Projected Units of New Construction Payment
Up to 20 $20,000
21 to 100 $150,000
of 2

101 to 200 $400,000
201 to 500 $740,000
501 or more $1,200,000
Subject to any conditions imposed by the department as a condition of approving a smart
growth zoning district or starter home zoning district, the zoning incentive payment shall be
payable upon confirmation of approval of the district by the department. The projected number
of units shall be based upon the zoning adopted in the smart growth zoning district or starter
home zoning district.
(b) The commonwealth shall pay from the trust fund or other funds from appropriations
or other money authorized by the general court a one-time density bonus payment to each city or
town with an approved smart growth zoning district and a one-time production bonus payment to
each city or town with an approved starter home zoning district. This payment shall be $6,000
for each housing unit of new construction created in the smart growth zoning district and $6,000
for each housing unit of new
construction created in the starter home zoning district. The amount due shall be paid on
a unit-by-unit basis in accordance with department regulations, upon submission by a city or
town of proof of issuance of a building permit for a particular housing unit or units within the
district.
of 2